Utah statutes.
26-28-125.   Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act.
This act modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global
and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not
modify, limit or supersede Section 101(a) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001,
or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section
103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).
